Mississippi, session 2026, HB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The State Department of Education shall establish a Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) pilot program designed to motivate eligible students in Grades 4 through 8 to pursue opportunities in STEM fields by introducing a variety of STEM careers to participating students and creating demanding yet rewarding challenges aimed at preparing those students for success in rigorous STEM academic courses as they progress to higher levels of education.  The pilot program must be implemented during the 2026-2027 school year in school districts situated in no less than thirteen (13) counties situated in the Delta region and in Jasper, Clarke and Jones Counties.  The State Department of Education shall select school districts for participation in the pilot program, with consideration given to any school district that expresses a particular desire to be a part of the pilot program. (2)  In order to be a participant in the STEM pilot program, a student must be identified by a school as being among the students performing at the highest levels on the most recent statewide assessment in mathematics.  The school in which a student is enrolled shall determine the number of students which the STEM pilot program may accommodate and shall identify the corresponding number of students who scored the highest on that assessment.  Selection for participation in the program must be done on an annual basis; however, a school district, in its discretion, may allow a participant who fails to meet eligibility criteria in a succeeding school year to remain in the program if the student demonstrates a continued willingness and interest. (3)  The STEM pilot program may include the following age-appropriate components: (a)  Introduction to a variety of occupations in all STEM fields by arranging for guest speakers in STEM careers to make school presentations that include a seminar type question and answer session and which highlight the rewarding aspects of their profession and how their jobs contribute to their communities; (b)  Collaboration with local employers in STEM fields through which field trips to the worksite may be arranged for pilot program participants; (c)  For students expressing an aptitude for or a continued interest in a particular STEM field, an opportunity, if feasible depending on the student's age, for the student to shadow a professional in the person's employment; (d)  Field trips to local colleges to introduce students to a variety of STEM programs of study, designed to motivate  participants and create an expectation of pursuing higher education notwithstanding the fact that no one in a student's family may have attended college; (e)  Introduction to the many scholarships, grants and other forms of financial assistance available to students for higher education so that no student determines college is not an option based on cost; (f)  Academic challenges designed to quiz students on information presented on particular fields, whether by outside presenters or through informational sessions by teachers in the school; and (g)  Any other components recommended by the State Department of Education which are designed to inspire and motivate students to pursue educational opportunities leading to a career in a STEM field. (4)  Each school participating in the STEM pilot program shall select a teacher to serve as the STEM program advisor.  The program advisor may be paid an annual salary supplement from any funds that are available to the district. (5)  Each participating school district shall prepare and submit a report to the State Department of Education at the end of each school year detailing the activities of the STEM pilot program.  The report must include, but need not be limited to, the number of participants by grade level, the number of students interested in remaining in the program in the succeeding school year, whether participants' performance on academic assessments improved, a description of the activities in which students participated, and such other information that the department may require.  Before December 1, 2029, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit a compiled report based on the participating school districts' reports to the Education Committees of the House of Representatives and Senate with recommendations on whether the pilot program should be made permanent in all school districts in the state. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.